Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3763.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 1, section 17, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. U.S. Highway 169 expansion; Itasca County. $6,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is appropriated from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for planning, predesign, design, engineering, and environmental analysis and remediation of expansion of marked U.S. Highway 169 from a two-lane to a four-lane divided highway between Taconite and Pengilly. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2027deleted text end new text begin 2029new text end . Sec. 2. new text begin ITASCA COUNTY; U.S. HIGHWAY 169 EXPANSION; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $8,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for planning, route selection, predesign, design, surface and mineral title searches, engineering, and environmental analysis and remediation for expansion of marked U.S. Highway 169 from two lanes to a four-lane divided highway from Itasca County State-Aid Highway 7 in Taconite to marked Trunk Highway 65 near Pengilly. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end